test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-valjmja_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - вальмя: # Ordinary nouns 'woman' - full paradigm including MWN
     вальмя+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: вальмя
     вальмя+N+SP+Gen+Indef: вальмянь
     вальмя+N+SP+Abl+Indef: вальмяда
     вальмя+N+SP+Dat+Indef: вальмянди
     вальмя+N+SP+Abe+Indef: вальмяфтома
     вальмя+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef: вальмяшка
     вальмя+N+SP+Ine+Indef: вальмяса
     вальмя+N+SP+Ela+Indef: вальмяста
     вальмя+N+SP+Ill+Indef: вальмяс
     вальмя+N+SP+Prl+Indef: вальмява
     вальмя+N+SP+Tra+Indef: вальмякс
     вальмя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: вальмязе
     вальмя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: вальмяне
     вальмя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: вальмязень
     вальмя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: вальмянень
     вальмя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [вальмязенди, вальмязти]
     вальмя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: вальмяненди
     вальмя+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: вальмядон
     вальмя+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: вальмяфтомон
     вальмя+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1: вальмяшкан
     вальмя+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: вальмясон
     вальмя+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: вальмястон
     вальмя+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: вальмязон
     вальмя+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: вальмяван
     вальмя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: вальмяце
     вальмя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: вальмятне
     вальмя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: вальмяцень
     вальмя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: вальмятнень
     вальмя+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: вальмядот
     вальмя+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: вальмяфтомот
     вальмя+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2: вальмяшкат
     вальмя+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: вальмясот
     вальмя+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: вальмястот
     вальмя+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: вальмязт
     вальмя+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: вальмяват
     вальмя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: вальмяц
     вальмя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: вальмянза
     вальмя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: вальмянц
     вальмя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: вальмянзон
     вальмя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: вальмянцты
     вальмя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: вальмянзонды
     вальмя+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: вальмядонза
     вальмя+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: вальмяфтомонза
     вальмя+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3: вальмяшканза
     вальмя+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: вальмясонза
     вальмя+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: вальмястонза
     вальмя+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: вальмязонза
     вальмя+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: вальмяванза
     вальмя+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: вальмяньке
     вальмя+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: вальмяньконь
     вальмя+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: вальмяньконди
     вальмя+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: вальмядонк
     вальмя+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: вальмяфтомонк
     вальмя+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1: вальмяшканк
     вальмя+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: вальмясонк
     вальмя+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: вальмястонк
     вальмя+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: вальмязонк
     вальмя+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: вальмяванк
     вальмя+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: вальмянте
     вальмя+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: вальмянтень
     вальмя+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: вальмянтенди
     вальмя+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: вальмядонт
     вальмя+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: вальмяфтомонт
     вальмя+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2: вальмяшкант
     вальмя+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: вальмясонт
     вальмя+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: вальмястонт
     вальмя+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: вальмязонт
     вальмя+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: вальмявант
     вальмя+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: вальмясна
     вальмя+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: вальмяснон
     вальмя+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: вальмяснонды
     вальмя+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: вальмядост
     вальмя+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: вальмяфтомост
     вальмя+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3: вальмяшкаст
     вальмя+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: вальмясост
     вальмя+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: вальмястост
     вальмя+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: вальмязост
     вальмя+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: вальмяваст
     вальмя+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: вальмят
     вальмя+N+Sg+Nom+Def: вальмясь
     вальмя+N+Sg+Gen+Def: вальмять
     вальмя+N+Sg+Dat+Def: вальмяти
     вальмя+N+Pl+Nom+Def: вальмятне
     вальмя+N+Pl+Gen+Def: вальмятнень
     вальмя+N+Pl+Dat+Def: вальмятненди    
     вальмя+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: вальмявок
     вальмя+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: вальмяньге
     вальмя+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Clt/Add: вальмядовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Clt/Add: [вальмяндивок, вальмяндиге, вальмяндинге]
     вальмя+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Clt/Add: вальмяфтомовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef+Clt/Add: вальмяшкавок
     вальмя+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Clt/Add: вальмясовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Clt/Add: вальмястовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Clt/Add: вальмяска
     вальмя+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Clt/Add: вальмявавок
     вальмя+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Clt/Add: вальмякска
     вальмя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вальмязевок
     вальмя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вальмяневок
     вальмя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вальмязеньге
     вальмя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вальмяненьге
     вальмя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: [вальмязендивок, вальмязтивок, вальмязендиге, вальмязтиге, вальмязендинге, вальмязтинге]
     вальмя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: [вальмянендивок, вальмянендиге, вальмянендинге]
     вальмя+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вальмядонга
     вальмя+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вальмяфтомонга
     вальмя+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вальмяшканга
     вальмя+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вальмясонга
     вальмя+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вальмястонга
     вальмя+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вальмязонга
     вальмя+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вальмяванга
     вальмя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вальмяцевок
     вальмя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вальмятневок
     вальмя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вальмяценьге
     вальмя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вальмятненьге
     вальмя+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вальмядотка
     вальмя+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вальмяфтомотка
     вальмя+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вальмяшкатка
     вальмя+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вальмясотка
     вальмя+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вальмястотка
     вальмя+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вальмязтка
     вальмя+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вальмяватка
     вальмя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вальмяцка
     вальмя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вальмянзовок
     вальмя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вальмянцка
     вальмя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вальмянзонга
     вальмя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вальмянцтывок
     вальмя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вальмянзондывок
     вальмя+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вальмядонзовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вальмяфтомонзовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вальмяшканзовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вальмясонзовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вальмястонзовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вальмязонзовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вальмяванзовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вальмянькевок
     вальмя+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вальмяньконьге
     вальмя+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Clt/Add: [вальмянькондивок, вальмянькондиге, вальмянькондинге]
     вальмя+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вальмядонковок
     вальмя+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вальмяфтомонковок
     вальмя+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вальмяшканковок
     вальмя+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вальмясонковок
     вальмя+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вальмястонковок
     вальмя+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вальмязонковок
     вальмя+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вальмяванковок
     вальмя+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вальмянтевок
     вальмя+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вальмянтеньге
     вальмя+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Clt/Add: [вальмянтендивок, вальмянтендиге, вальмянтендинге]
     вальмя+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вальмядонтовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вальмяфтомонтовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вальмяшкантовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вальмясонтовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вальмястонтовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вальмязонтовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вальмявантовок
     вальмя+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вальмясновок
     вальмя+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вальмяснонга
     вальмя+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вальмяснондывок
     вальмя+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вальмядостка
     вальмя+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вальмяфтомостка
     вальмя+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вальмяшкастка
     вальмя+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вальмясостка
     вальмя+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вальмястостка
     вальмя+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вальмязостка
     вальмя+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вальмявастка
     вальмя+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: вальмятка
     вальмя+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: вальмяське
     вальмя+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: вальмятьке
     вальмя+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: [вальмятивок, вальмятиге, вальмятинге]
     вальмя+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: вальмятневок
     вальмя+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: вальмятненьге
     вальмя+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: [вальмятнендивок, вальмятнендиге, вальмятнендинге]
